Washington statutes.
RCW 42.08.010

Scope of coverage.

The official bond of a public officer, to the state, or to any county, city, town or other municipal or public corporation of like character therein, shall be deemed a security to the state, or to such county, city, town or other municipal or public corporation, as the case may be, and also to all persons severally, for the official delinquencies against which it is intended to provide.

[Code 1881 s 652; 1877 p 135 s 655; 1869 p 152 s 592; RRS s 958.]

NOTES:

Bonds payable to state: RCW 42.08.060.